Arkansas, session 2025, HB1608.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF ARKANSAS:

SECTION 1. Arkansas Code § 13-4-204(a), concerning destruction of an
original document, is amended to read as follows:
(a) When any document is recorded by the means prescribed by § 13-4-
201, the paper original may be destroyed unless the document is over fifty
(50) years old and handwritten or and has been determined to be of historical
value by the Arkansas State Archives.

SECTION 2. Arkansas Code § 13-4-301(b)(1), concerning retention and
destruction of county records, is amended to read as follows:
(b)(1) If a record is photographically or electronically transferred
to other media of a permanent nature, the original documents may be
destroyed, except that no handwritten records over fifty (50) years old shall
be destroyed without the consultation and approval of the Arkansas State
*SSS153*
02/25/2025 8:05:51 AM SSS153

HB1608
Archives.



































02/25/2025 8:05:51 AM SSS153